Rhode Island, session 2025, HB6087.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 23 of the General Laws entitled "HEALTH AND SAFETY" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 104
HEALTHCARE WORKER PLATFORM ACT
23-104-1. Title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "Healthcare Worker Platform Act."
23-104-2. Definitions.
For the purposes of this chapter, the following words and terms have the following
meanings:
(a) “Healthcare worker platform" means any person, company, corporation, partnership, or
association that operates or offers a platform. A “healthcare worker platform” is not considered a
“nursing service agency” as defined in § 23-17.7.1-2.
(b) “Platform” means an electronic platform, system, or application through which
healthcare workers can accept one or more shifts to perform healthcare related services at a
healthcare facility. To meet the definition of a platform, a healthcare worker platform shall not: (1)
require a healthcare worker to work any specific shifts or specific number of shifts at a healthcare
facility; or (2) restrict a healthcare worker from engaging in any other occupation or business or
from working at a healthcare facility, with any nursing service agency, or through any other
healthcare worker platform.

23-104-3. Licensure of healthcare worker platforms.
(a) Notwithstanding any other provision to the contrary, a healthcare worker platform shall
be excluded from the definition of a “nursing service agency” as defined by §§ 23-17.7.1-3, 23-
17.7.1-10, and 23-17.7.1-19.
(b) On or before June 1, 2026, the department of health shall promulgate rules and
regulations that shall require the licensure of each healthcare worker platform that operates or offers
a platform within the state.
(c) The department of health may assess an annual licensure fee of one thousand dollars
($1,000) per licensee.
(d) After September 1, 2026, or by the date the department of health has set for licensure
of healthcare worker platforms pursuant to subsection (b) of this section, whichever is later, no
healthcare worker platform shall operate a platform in the state unless it is licensed pursuant to
subsection (b) of this section.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002365/SUB A
========
LC002365/SUB A - Page 2 of 3